Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1901
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that, due to severe weather conditions and diseases, cities and villages across Nebraska are experiencing tree mortality. Most cities and villages have been unable to act decisively due to insufficient funds to remove, dispose of, and replace trees situated on public land. Dead trees are fast becoming a liability and a safety problem for cities and villages.

Laws 1994, LB 695, § 1.